Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,181
Traversing defiles, canyons, or mountain highways; audible warning.

The driver of a motor vehicle traversing defiles, canyons, or mountain highways shall hold such motor vehicle under control and as near the right-hand side of the highway as reasonably possible and, upon approaching any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of two hundred feet along the highway, shall give audible warning with a horn or other device.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 79;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-679;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 277.